Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-406
Registration; fees.

(1) The department shall issue registrations and reregistrations to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, or dispense controlled substances within this state on a biennial basis.

(2) The various fees to be paid by applicants for registrations and reregistrations, as required under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, shall be as follows:

(a) Registration or reregistration to manufacture controlled substances, not less than one hundred dollars and not more than three hundred dollars;

(b) Registration or reregistration to distribute controlled substances, not less than one hundred dollars and not more than three hundred dollars;

(c) Registration or reregistration to prescribe, administer, or dispense controlled substances, not less than twenty dollars and not more than one hundred fifty dollars;

(d) Registration or reregistration to engage in research on the use and effects of controlled substances, not less than fifty dollars and not more than two hundred dollars;

(e) Registration or reregistration to engage in laboratory and analytical analysis of controlled substances, not less than fifty dollars and not more than two hundred dollars; and

(f) Registration or reregistration to provide detoxification treatment or maintenance treatment, not less than twenty dollars and not more than one hundred fifty dollars.

(3) The department shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund.

(4) All registrations and reregistrations shall expire on August 31 of each odd-numbered year. Registration shall be automatically denied without a hearing for nonpayment of fees. Any registration or reregistration not renewed by payment of renewal fees by October 1 of odd-numbered years shall be automatically denied and canceled on October 2 of odd-numbered years without a hearing.

(5) The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 66;

Laws 1985, LB 323, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 33;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 550, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 2.